Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 291, O.S.L.
2023, as amended by Section 3, Chapter 57, O.S.L. 2025 (70 O.S.
Supp. 2025, Section 6-104.8), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-104.8. A. 1. Full-time employees of a public school
district in this state who have been employed by the a school
district in this state for at least one year and have worked at
least one thousand two hundred fifty (1,250) hours during the
preceding twelve-month period;
2. Persons employed full time as classroom instructional
employees of technology center school districts supervised by the
Req. No. 14444 Page 1

Stat e Board of Career and Technology Education who have been
employed by the a technology center school district in this state
for at least one year and have worked at least one thousand two
hundred fifty (1,250) hours during the preceding twelve-month
period;
3. Persons employed as teachers by the State Department of
Rehabilitation Services who have been employed by the State
Department of Rehabilitation Services for at least one year and have
worked at least one thousand two hundred fifty (1,250) hours during
the preceding twelve-month period;
4. Persons employed full time as correctional teachers or
vocational instructors by the Department of Corrections pursuant to
Section 510.6a of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes who have been
employed by a Department of Corrections facility for at least one
year and have worked at least one thousand two hundred fifty (1,250)
hours during the preceding twelve-month period; and
5. Persons employed full time as teachers by the Office of
Juvenile Affairs who have been employed by an Office of Juvenile
Affairs facility for at least one year and have worked at least one
thousand two hundred fifty (1,250) hours during the preceding
twelve-month period,
shall be entitled to six (6) weeks of paid maternity leave following
the birth of the employee's child. The six (6) weeks of paid

Req. No. 14444 Page 2

mate rnity leave shall be used immediately following the birth of the
school district employee's child.
B. 1. Paid maternity leave provided pursuant to paragraphs 1,
2, and 3 of subsection A of this section shall be in addition to and
not in place of sick leave due to pregnancy, as authorized by
Section 6-104 of this title.
2. Paid maternity leave provided pursuant to paragraph 4 of
subsection A of this section shall be in addition to and not in
place of sick leave due to pregnancy, as authorized by Section
510.6a of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
3. Paid maternity leave provided pursuant to paragraph 5 of
subsection A of this section shall be in addition to and not in
place of sick leave due to pregnancy, as authorized by Section 2-7-
202 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes.
C. 1. Employees described in subsection A of this section
shall have the right to utilize accrued sick leave to extend the
duration of their maternity leave beyond the six (6) weeks provided
by this section. Such sick leave may be used for recovery from
childbirth, bonding with a newborn, or caring for a newborn, and
shall not require additional approval from a school board or
employer, provided the employee has sufficient sick leave to cover
the extended duration. Sick leave used pursuant to this subsection
shall not exceed six (6) weeks, unless a licensed medical
professional provides written certification recommending additional
Req. No. 14444 Page 3

leav e for medical necessity related to the employee's recovery from
child birth, or for the care of the newborn, to achieve a combined
twelve (12) weeks of FMLA leave in accordance with paragraph 2 of
this subsection.
2. An employee seeking to use sick leave to extend the duration
of their maternity leave shall notify their employer in accordance
with the Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 (FMLA). FMLA leave
shall run concurrently with the paid sick leave extended duration.
D. An employee who takes maternity leave pursuant to the
provisions of subsection A of this section shall not be deprived of
any compensation or other benefits to which the employee is
otherwise entitled.
E. Each fiscal year, the Legislature shall appropriate adequate
funding to the Public School Paid Maternity Leave Revolving Fund
created in Section 6-104.9 of this title for the purpose of
providing paid maternity leave to eligible school district employees
pursuant to paragraph 1 of subsection A of this section. If the
Legislature does not appropriate adequate funding specifically for
the purpose of providing paid maternity leave to school district
employees, the State Board of Education shall allocate from the
funds appropriated to the State Board of Education for the support
of public school activities an amount to fully fund paid maternity
leave.

Req. No. 14444 Page 4

F. The State Board of Education, the State Board of Career and
Technology Education, the Commission for Rehabilitation Services,
the State Board of Corrections, and the Board of Juvenile Affairs
may promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-14444 AQH 12/08/25













Req. No. 14444 Page 5